Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-822
Employees; no requirement to work without consent.

No provision of the Industrial Relations Act shall be construed to require an employee to work without his or her consent, or to make illegal the quitting of his or her job or withdrawal from his or her place of employment unless done in concert or by agreement with others.

Laws 1947, c. 178, § 22, p. 594;

Laws 1986, LB 809, § 8.